Tennessee, session 114, SB0760.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 1-3-120(f), is amended by adding the
following as a new subdivision:
(8) Does not require a fee or a subscription for a person to view the website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0760
002547
- 1 -